fr: Désignation de taille de la plaque de lanceur: Adulte/Officiel (6 x 24 po); Personnalisé; Pro/Universitaire étendu; À gradin; Jeunes (4 x 18 po); Autre
pt-PT: Designação do tamanho da borracha de lançamento: Adulto/oficial (6 x 24 pol.); Personalizada; Profissional/universidade expandida; Com degrau; Júnior (4 x 18 pol.); Outra
pl: Oznaczenie rozmiaru płyty miotacza: Dla dorosłych / oficjalny (6 in x 24 in); Niestandardowy; Przedłużony Pro / College; Obniżany; Dla młodzieży (4 in x 18 in); Inny
hu: Dobásterületi gumi méretmegjelölése: Felnőtt/hivatalos (6 in x 24 in); Egyedi; Profi/főiskolai, meghosszabbított; Lépcsős; Ifjúsági (4 in x 18 in); Egyéb
de: Größenbezeichnung des Pitching Rubber: Erwachsene/Offiziell (6 in x 24 in); Benutzerdefiniert; Pro/College erweitert; Abgestuft; Jugend (4 in x 18 in); Andere
th: การกำหนดขนาดของยางขว้าง: ผู้ใหญ่/เป็นทางการ (6 x 24 นิ้ว); กำหนดเอง; ขยายแบบโปร/วิทยาลัย; แบบขั้นบันได (Step-Down); เยาวชน (4 x 18 นิ้ว); อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Oznaka veličine gume za bacanje: Za odrasle / službena (6 in x 24 in); Prilagođeno; Za profesionalce / koledž (proširena); Stupnjevana (Step-Down); Za mlade (4 in x 18 in); Ostalo
en: Pitching rubber size designation: Adult/Official (6 in x 24 in); Custom; Pro/College Extended; Step-Down; Youth (4 in x 18 in); Other
nb: Størrelsesbetegnelse for kasterplate: Voksen/offisiell (6 in x 24 in); Egendefinert; Pro/College utvidet; Nedtrappet; Ungdom (4 in x 18 in); Annet
ko: 피칭러버 사이즈 지정: 성인용/공식(6인치 x 24인치); 맞춤형; 프로/대학 확장형; 스텝다운; 유소년용(4인치 x 18인치); 기타
nl: Werpplaat maataanduiding: Volwassenen/officieel (6 x 24 inch); Aangepast; Pro/College verlengd; Step-down; Jeugd (4 x 18 inch); Overig
el: Κατηγορία μεγέθους της πλάκας ρίψης: Ενηλίκων/Επίσημο (6 in x 24 in); Προσαρμοσμένο; Επαγγελματικό/Κολεγιακό διευρυμένο; Step-Down; Νέων (4 in x 18 in); Άλλο
ja: ピッチングラバーのサイズ表記: 大人用/公式 (6インチ x 24インチ); カスタム; プロ/大学用拡張; ステップダウン; ユース用 (4インチ x 18インチ); その他
pt-BR: Placa do arremessador designação de tamanho: Adulto/Oficial (6 pol. x 24 pol.); Personalizado; Profissional/Universitário estendido; Escalonado; Infantil (4 pol. x 18 pol.); Outros
fi: Syöttölevyn kokomerkintä: Aikuisten/Virallinen (6 in x 24 in); Mukautettu; Pro/College -laajennettu; Alennettu; Nuorten (4 in x 18 in); Muu
da: Størrelsesbetegnelse for kasteplanke: Voksen/officiel (6 in x 24 in); Tilpasset; Pro/college udvidet; Step-down; Ungdom (4 in x 18 in); Andet
bg-BG: Обозначение за размер на гумата за хвърляне: За възрастни/Официален (6 инча x 24 инча); По поръчка; Професионален/Колежански удължен; Стъпаловиден; За младежи (4 инча x 18 инча); Друго
es: Designación de tamaño de la goma de lanzamiento: Adulto/oficial (6 in x 24 in); Personalizado; Profesional/universitario ampliado; Escalonada; Juvenil (4 in x 18 in); Otro
vi: Ký hiệu kích thước cao su ném bóng: Người lớn/Chính thức (6 in x 24 in); Tùy chỉnh; Mở rộng cho Chuyên nghiệp/Đại học; Thiết kế giật cấp; Trẻ em (4 in x 18 in); Khác
sl-SI: Oznaka velikosti metalne plošče: Odrasli/uradno (6 in x 24 in); Po meri; Pro/College podaljšano; Stopničasto; Mladinsko (4 in x 18 in); Drugo
it: Designazione delle dimensioni del tappetino di lancio: Adulto/ufficiale (6 in x 24 in); Personalizzata; Pro/college estesa; Ribassata; Ragazzi (4 in x 18 in); Altro
zh-CN: 投手投球橡胶尺寸规格: 成人/官方（6 英寸 x 24 英寸）; 自定义; 专业/大学加长版; 阶梯式; 青少年（4 英寸 x 18 英寸）; 其他
zh-TW: 投手板尺寸規格: 成人/官方 (6 吋 x 24 吋); 自訂; 職業/大學加長型; 階梯型; 兒童 (4 吋 x 18 吋); 其他
tr: Atış lastiği boyut sınıflandırması: Yetişkin/Resmi (6 x 24 inç); Özel; Profesyonel/Kolej Uzatılmış; Kademeli; Genç (4 x 18 inç); Diğer
sv: Storleksbeteckning för pitching rubber: Vuxen/officiell (6 x 24 tum); Anpassad; Proffs/college förlängd; Step-down; Ungdom (4 x 18 tum); Övrigt
ru: Обозначение размера питчерной резины: Для взрослых / официальный (6 x 24 дюймов); Пользовательский; Профессиональный / для колледжей (удлиненный); Ступенчатый; Подростковый (4 x 18 дюймов); Другое
lt-LT: Metimo gumos dydžio klasė: Suaugusiųjų / oficialus (6 col. x 24 col.); Pasirinktinis; Profesionalų / koledžų (pailgintas); Nuožulnus; Jaunimo (4 col. x 18 col.); Kita
sk-SK: Označenie veľkosti nadhadzovacej podložky: Pre dospelých/oficiálna (6 in x 24 in); Vlastná; Profesionálna/vysokoškolská rozšírená; Stupňovitá; Mládežnícka (4 in x 18 in); Iné
cs: Označení velikosti nadhazovací gumy: Pro dospělé / oficiální (6 in x 24 in); Vlastní; Profesionální / vysokoškolská prodloužená; Stupňovitá (step-down); Mládežnická (4 in x 18 in); Ostatní
ro-RO: Denumirea dimensiunii cauciucului de lansare: Adult/Oficial (6 in x 24 in); Personalizat; Pro/Colegiu extins; În trepte (Step-down); Tineret (4 in x 18 in); Altele